California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(r) A managed care health plan established pursuant to this section, or under the Special Terms and Conditions of the demonstration project pursuant to Section 14180, shall be subject to, and comply with, the requirement for submission of encounter data specified in Section 14182.1.

(s) (1) Commencing January 1, 2011, and until January 1, 2014, the department shall provide the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature with semiannual updates regarding core activities for the enrollment of seniors and persons with disabilities into managed care health plans pursuant to the pilot program. The semiannual updates shall include key milestones, progress toward the objectives of the pilot program, relevant or necessary changes to the program, submittal of state plan amendments to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, submittal of any federal waiver documents, and other key activities related
 to the mandatory enrollment of seniors and persons with disabilities into managed care health plans. The department shall also include updates on the transition of individuals into managed care health plans, the health outcomes of enrollees, the care management and coordination process, and other information concerning the success or overall status of the pilot program.

(2) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(t) The department, in collaboration with the State Department of Social Services and county welfare departments, shall monitor the
 utilization and caseload of the In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS) program before and during the implementation of the pilot program. This information shall be monitored in order to identify the impact of the pilot program on the IHSS program for the affected population.

(u) Services under Section 14132.95 or 14132.952, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 that are provided to individuals assigned to managed care health plans under this section shall be provided through direct hiring of personnel, contract, or establishment of a public authority or nonprofit consortium, in accordance with and subject to the requirements of Section 12302 or 12301.6, as applicable.

(v) The department shall, at a minimum, monitor on a quarterly basis the adequacy of provider networks of the managed care health plans.

(w) The department shall suspend new enrollment of seniors and persons with disabilities into a managed care health plan if it determines that the managed care health plan does not have sufficient primary or specialty providers to meet the needs of their enrollees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 221.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Implementation is contingent upon federal funding, pursuant to subd. (g).)
-------------------------------------------

14182.1.

(a) Beginning March 2011, the department shall convene a stakeholder workgroup to review the existing encounter, claims, and financial data submission process required by the department under managed care health plan contracts. The workgroup members shall be selected by the department and shall include interested representatives from Medi-Cal managed care health plans, managed care health plan
 associations, hospitals, individual health care providers, physician groups, and consumer representatives. In reviewing the process, the department shall consider input from the stakeholder workgroup and develop data quality submission standards by October 2011.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2012, managed care health plans shall comply with the quality submission standards developed pursuant to subdivision (a) when submitting data to the department. The director may impose a penalty for each month that a managed care health plan fails to submit data in compliance with these standards. The penalty shall be in proportion to that plan’s failure to comply with the data submission standards, as the director in his or her sole discretion determines, and in no event shall the penalty exceed 2 percent of the total monthly capitation rate for that plan.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. Prior to issuing any letter or similar instrument authorized pursuant to this section, the department shall notify and consult with stakeholders, including advocates, providers, and beneficiaries. The department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue instructions under this section at least five days in advance of the issuance. If the department elects to adopt regulations, the adoption of regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 335.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14182.15.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent that it does not jeopardize other federal funding and is permitted by federal law, the intergovernmental transfers described in this section provide support for the nonfederal share of risk-based payments to managed care health plans to enable those plans to compensate designated public hospitals in a sufficient amount to preserve and strengthen the availability and quality of services provided by those
 hospitals and their affiliated public providers. It is further the intent of the Legislature that transferring public entities elect to provide intergovernmental transfers in an amount that is at least equivalent to the amount of the nonfederal share that they would provide under fee-for-service, as adjusted for utilization.

(b) (1) In conjunction with the implementation of Section 14182, a public entity may elect to transfer public funds to the state to be used solely as the nonfederal share of Medi-Cal payments to managed care health plans for the provision of services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means a designated public hospital as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1, the University of California, or a county or city and county or local hospital authority that is licensed to operate one or more of
 the designated public hospitals.

(c) If a public entity elects to make intergovernmental transfers pursuant to this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) To ensure that the implementation of Section 14182 does not jeopardize the ability of designated public hospitals and their affiliated public providers to continue serving Medi-Cal beneficiaries, to the extent permitted under federal law, the department shall require managed care health plans to pay the designated public hospital and other governmental providers affiliated with the transferring public entity for services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, amounts that are no less than the amount to which the providers would have otherwise been entitled, including the federal and nonfederal share, on a fee-for-service basis, for the full scope of Medi-Cal services, including supplemental payments and any additional
 federally permissible amount. The payment amounts required by this paragraph shall be based upon the volume of Medi-Cal services provided by the designated public hospitals and other governmental providers affiliated with the transferring public entity.

(2) Except as provided in Section 14105.24, to the extent that the payments described in paragraph (1) result in increased payments by the managed care health plans to the designated public hospitals and other governmental providers affiliated with the transferring public entity that are the basis of increased rates paid by the department to the managed care health plans above the amount that would have been paid in the absence of paragraph (1), the nonfederal share of the increased rates shall be borne by the transferring entity as described in subdivision (d) and there shall be no additional impact on state General Fund expenditures. Additionally, the payment rates shall only be paid to the
 extent they can be certified as actuarially sound and as permitted under federal law.

(d) The department shall meet and confer with the public entities regarding their election to contribute to the nonfederal share of federal Medicaid expenditures under this section and to determine each public entity’s intergovernmental transfer amount, which shall be comprised of the following:

(1) An amount that is equivalent to the nonfederal share of the rates of compensation the public entity’s designated public hospital would receive from managed care health plans, without regard to the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), for Medi-Cal inpatient days of service that otherwise would have been rendered on a fee-for-service basis in the absence of the implementation of Section 14182 to Medi-Cal enrollees who are seniors and persons with disabilities.

(2) An amount that is equivalent to the nonfederal share of the amount which the designated public hospital and other governmental providers affiliated with the transferring entity would have otherwise incurred on a fee-for-service basis for providing Medi-Cal services to the Medi-Cal managed care health plan enrollees they serve, including supplemental payments, excluding the nonfederal share of those amounts the plan will pay for the services without regard to the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), and consistent with Section 14105.24, to the extent otherwise applicable.

(3) Amounts equivalent to the nonfederal share of additional federally permissible payments.

(e) Prior to accepting the transfer amounts from a public entity determined under subdivision (d), the department shall ensure that its
 contracts with the applicable managed care health plans and the contracts between the managed care health plans and the public entities require, to the extent permitted under federal law, that the managed care health plans pay the designated public hospitals, and other governmental providers affiliated with the transferring entities, amounts that are in furtherance of the intent of this section as described in subdivision (a) and consistent with what the designated public hospital and other governmental providers affiliated with the transferring public entity would have received through fee-for-service, and that the payment amounts meet the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(f) The department shall obtain federal approvals or waivers as necessary to implement this section and to obtain federal matching funds to the maximum extent permitted by federal law.

(g) Participation in intergovernmental transfers under this section is voluntary on the part of the transferring entity for purposes of all applicable federal laws. As part of its voluntary participation in the nonfederal share of payments under this section by means of intergovernmental transfers, the transferring entity agrees to reimburse the state for the nonfederal share of state staffing or administrative costs directly attributable to implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 714, Sec. 22.   (SB 208)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14182.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14094.3, in furtherance of the waiver or demonstration project developed pursuant to Section 14180, the director shall establish, by January 1, 2012, organized health care delivery models for children eligible for California Children Services (CCS) under Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code. These models shall be chosen from the following:

(1) An enhanced primary care case management program.

(2) A provider-based accountable care organization.

(3) A specialty health care plan.

(4) A Medi-Cal managed care plan that includes payment and coverage for CCS-eligible conditions.

(b) Each model shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish clear standards and criteria for participation, exemption, enrollment, and disenrollment.

(2) Provide care coordination that links children and youth with special health care needs with appropriate services and resources in a coordinated manner to achieve optimum
 health.

(3) Establish networks that include CCS-approved providers and maintain the current system of regionalized pediatric specialty and subspecialty services to ensure that children and youth have timely access to appropriate and qualified providers.

(4) Coordinate out-of-network access if appropriate and qualified providers are not part of the network or in the region.

(5) Ensure that children enrolled in the model receive care for their CCS-eligible medical conditions from CCS-approved providers consistent with the CCS standards of care.

(6) Participate in a statewide quality improvement collaborative that includes stakeholders.

(7) (A) Establish and support
 medical homes, incorporating all of the following principles:

(i) Each child has a personal physician.

(ii) The medical home is a physician-directed medical practice.

(iii) The medical home utilizes a whole child orientation.

(iv) Care is coordinated or integrated across all of the elements of the health care system and the family and child’s community.

(v) Information, education, and support to consumers and families in the program is provided in a culturally competent manner.

(vi) Quality and safety practices and measures.

(vii) Provides enhanced access to
 care, including access to after-hours care.

(viii) Payment is structured appropriately to recognize the added value provided to children and their families.

(B) In implementing this section, and the terms and conditions of the demonstration project, the department may alter the medical home principles described in this paragraph as necessary to secure the increased federal financial participation associated with the provision of medical assistance in conjunction with a health home, as made available under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and codified in Section 1945 of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. The department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature of its intent to alter medical
 home principles under this section at least five days in advance of taking this action.

(8) Provide the department with data for quality monitoring and improvement measures, as determined necessary by the department. The department shall institute quality monitoring and improvement measures that are appropriate for children and youth with special health care needs.

(c) The services provided under these models shall not be limited to medically necessary services required to treat the CCS-eligible medical condition.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, the department may require eligible individuals to enroll in these models.

(e) At the election of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and with
 the consent of the director, children enrolled in the Healthy Families Program pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, who are eligible for CCS under Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, may enroll in the organized health care delivery models established under this section.

(f) For the purposes of implementing this section, the department shall seek proposals to establish and test these models of organized health care delivery systems, may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis, and may amend existing managed care contracts to provide or arrange for services under this section. Contracts may be statewide or on a more limited geographic basis. Contracts entered into or amended under this section shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2
 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) Entities contracting with the department under this section shall report expenditures for the services provided under the contract.

(2) If a contractor is paid according to a capitated or risk-based payment methodology, the rates shall be actuarially sound and take into account care coordination activities.

(h) (1) The department shall conduct an evaluation to assess the effectiveness of each model in improving the delivery of health care services for children who are eligible for CCS. The department shall consult with stakeholders in developing an evaluation for the models being tested.

(2) The evaluation process shall begin simultaneously with the development and implementation of the model delivery systems to compare the care provided to, and outcomes of, children enrolled in the models with those not enrolled in the models. The evaluation shall include, at a minimum, an assessment of all of the following:

(A) The types of services and expenditures for services.

(B) Improvement in the coordination of care for children.

(C) Improvement in the quality of care.

(D) Improvement in the value of care provided.

(E) The rate of growth of expenditures.

(F) Parent satisfaction.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. Prior to issuing any letter or similar instrument authorized pursuant to this section, the department shall notify and consult with stakeholders, including advocates, providers, and beneficiaries. The department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue instructions under this section at least five days in advance of the issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 714, Sec. 23.   (SB 208)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14182.3.

(a) To the extent the provisions of Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 14166) do not conflict with the provisions of this article or the Special Terms and Conditions of the new demonstration project created under this article, the provisions of Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 14166) shall continue to apply to the new demonstration project.

(b) In the event of a conflict between any provision of this article and the Special Terms and Conditions required by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the approval of the demonstration project described in Section 14180, the Special Terms and Conditions shall control.

(c) (1) Under the demonstration project described in Section 14180, the state shall have priority to claim against and retain the first five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in federal funds using expenditures incurred under state-only programs or other programs for which the state is authorized to claim under the Special Terms and Conditions of the demonstration project or federal Medicaid law, including state-only programs that serve special populations, such as those for which state savings were recognized in the Budget Act for the 2010–11 fiscal year.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the director determines that the amount of base funding available under the demonstration project described in Section 14180 is less than the six hundred eighty-one million six hundred forty thousand dollars ($681,640,000) available to public hospitals under the original demonstration project, the state may reallocate an amount from the five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) described in paragraph (1) to increase the amount of base funding under the new demonstration project to six hundred eighty one million six hundred forty thousand dollars ($681,640,000).

(3) For purposes of this section, the term “base funding” includes funding for the safety net care pool or a similar pool or fund for health coverage expansion, and for an investment, incentive, or similar pool, but shall not include funds made available to hospitals or counties for
 inpatient or outpatient Medi-Cal reimbursements, expansion of managed care for seniors and persons with disabilities, or other expansions of systems of care for individuals who are eligible under the Medi-Cal state plan.

(4) If the state is unable to claim the full amount of the five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) described in paragraph (1), any portion of the amount that remains unclaimed may be reallocated to be claimed based on the certified public expenditures of the designated public hospitals.

(d) The director shall have authority to maximize available federal financial participation under the demonstration project described in Section 14180, including, but not limited to, authorizing the use of intergovernmental transfers by district hospitals that are not reimbursed under a contract negotiated pursuant to the Selective Provider Contracting Program, to fund the
 nonfederal share of expenditures to the extent permitted by the Special Terms and Conditions of the demonstration project.

(e) Participation in intergovernmental transfers under this section is voluntary on the part of the transferring entity for purposes of all applicable federal laws. As part of its voluntary participation in the nonfederal share of payments under this subdivision by means of intergovernmental transfers, the transferring entity agrees to reimburse the state for the nonfederal share of state staffing or administrative costs directly attributable to the state’s implementation of these voluntary intergovernmental transfers. This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, the department may clarify, interpret, or implement the provisions of this section by means of provider bulletins or similar instructions. The department shall notify the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue instructions under this section at least five days in advance of the issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 20.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14182.4.

(a) To the extent authorized under a federal waiver or demonstration project described in Section 14180 that is approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department shall establish a program of investment, improvement, and incentive payments for designated public hospitals and, to the extent federal approval is obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14166.155, for
 nondesignated public hospitals to encourage and incentivize delivery system transformation and innovation in preparation for the implementation of federal health care reform.

(b) The Public Hospital Investment, Improvement, and Incentive Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for the purposes specified in this section.

(c) The fund shall consist of any moneys that a county, other political subdivision of the state, or other governmental entity in the state that may elect to transfer to the department for deposit into the fund, as permitted under Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or any other applicable federal Medicaid laws.

(d) Moneys in the fund shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of investment, improvement, and incentive payments as authorized under a federal waiver or demonstration project to participating designated public hospitals and, to the extent federal approval is obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14166.155, to nondesignated public hospitals, defined in subdivisions (d) and (f) of Section 14166.1 respectively, and the governmental entities with which they are affiliated, that provide the intergovernmental transfers for deposit into the fund.

(e) The department shall obtain federal financial participation for moneys in the fund to the full extent permitted by law. Moneys shall be allocated from the fund by the department and used as the nonfederal share for claiming federal funds in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions of the waiver or demonstration project and Sections 14166.77 and 14166.155, to
 the extent federal approval is obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14166.151, as applicable. The moneys disbursed from the fund, and all associated federal financial participation, shall be distributed only to the designated public hospitals and the governmental entities with which they are affiliated, and to the extent federal approval is obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14166.155, to nondesignated public hospitals as described in subdivision (a) and the governmental entities with which they are affiliated.

(f) Participation under this section is voluntary on the part of the county or other political subdivision for purposes of all applicable federal laws. As part of its voluntary participation in the nonfederal share of payments under this section, the county or other political subdivision agrees to reimburse the state for the nonfederal share of state staffing or administrative costs directly attributable to
 implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may clarify, interpret, or implement the provisions of this section by means of provider bulletins or similar instructions. The department shall notify the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue instructions under this section at least five days in advance of the issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 109.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14182.45.

(a) In consultation with the designated public hospitals, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1, and to the extent it does not impede the ability of the designated public hospitals to meet the requirements and conditions for delivery system reform incentive payments authorized under Sections 14166.77 and 14182.4, the state may provide for milestone incentive payments to private
 disproportionate share hospitals and nondesignated public disproportionate share hospitals to create incentives for improvement activities towards, and achievement of, delivery system transformation. The milestone incentive payments to private disproportionate share hospitals and nondesignated public disproportionate share hospitals shall be structured in accordance with the requirements and conditions for delivery system reform incentive payments set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions and as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Incentive payments may be funded by voluntary intergovernmental transfers made by the designated public hospitals and nondesignated public hospitals. All incentive pool funding, including any potential private and nondesignated public hospital subpools, shall be limited to the total amount of incentive pool funding allowed for delivery system reform incentive payments as set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions.

(b) Upon federal approval of the reimbursement methodology in subdivision (b) of Section 14166.151, this section shall become inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 110.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

14182.9.

Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the provisions of this article through all-county welfare director letters or similar instruction, without taking regulatory action. Prior to issuing any letter or similar instrument authorized pursuant to this section, the department shall notify and consult with stakeholders, including
 advocates, providers, and beneficiaries, in implementing, interpreting, or making specific this article. The department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue instructions under this section at least five days in advance of the issuance.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14182 by Stats. 2010, Ch. 714, Sec. 19.   (SB 208)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration Project Act [14184. - 14184.90.]

14184.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration Project Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The implementation of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and California’s “Bridge to Reform” Medicaid demonstration project have led to the expansion of Medi-Cal coverage to more than 13 million beneficiaries, driving health care delivery system reforms that support expanded access to care, as well as higher quality, efficiency, and beneficiary satisfaction.

(2) California’s “Medi-Cal 2020” Medicaid demonstration project, No. 11-W-00193/9, expands on these achievements by continuing to focus on expanded health care system capacity, better coordinated care, and aligned incentives within the Medi-Cal program in order to improve health outcomes for Medi-Cal beneficiaries, while simultaneously containing health care costs.

(3) Public safety net providers, including designated public hospitals, and nondesignated public hospitals, which are also known as district and municipal public hospitals, play an essential role in the Medi-Cal program, providing high-quality care to a disproportionate number of low-income Medi-Cal and uninsured populations in the state. Because Medi-Cal covers approximately one-third of the state’s population, the strength of these essential health care systems and hospitals is of critical importance to the health and welfare of the people of California.

(4) As a component of the “Medi-Cal 2020” demonstration project, the Global Payment Program provides an opportunity to test an alternative payment model for the remaining uninsured that rewards value and supports providing care at the appropriate place and time, aligning incentives to enhance primary and preventive services for California’s remaining uninsured seeking care in participating public health care systems.

(5) As a component of the “Medi-Cal 2020” demonstration project, the Public Hospital Redesign and Incentives in Medi-Cal (PRIME) program seeks to improve health outcomes for patients served by participating entities by building on the delivery system transformation work from the “Bridge to Reform” demonstration project. Using evidence-based quality improvement methods, the PRIME program is intended to be ambitious in scope in order to accelerate transformation in care
 delivery and maximize value for patients, providers, and payers. The PRIME program also seeks to strengthen the ability of designated public hospitals to successfully perform under risk-based alternative payment models (APMs) in the long term.

(6) As a component of the “Medi-Cal 2020” demonstration project, the Whole Person Care pilot program creates an opportunity for counties, Medi-Cal managed care plans, and community providers to establish a new model for integrated care delivery that incorporates health care needs, behavioral health, and social support for the state’s most vulnerable, high-user populations. The Whole Person Care pilot program encourages coordination among local partners to address the root causes of poor health outcomes, including immediate health needs and other factors, such as housing and recidivism, that impact a beneficiary’s health status.

(7) As a
 component of the “Medi-Cal 2020” demonstration project, the Dental Transformation Initiative creates innovative opportunities for the Medi-Cal Dental Program to improve access to dental care, continuity of care, and increase the utilization of preventive services aimed at reducing preventable dental conditions for Medi-Cal beneficiaries identified within the project.

(c) The implementation of the “Medi-Cal 2020” demonstration project, as set forth in this article, will support all of the following goals:

(1) Improving access to health care and health care quality for California’s Medi-Cal and uninsured populations.

(2) Promoting value and improving health outcomes for low-income populations.

(3) Supporting whole person care by better integrating
 physical health, behavioral health, and social support services for high-risk, high-utilizing Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(4) Improving the capacity of public safety net providers that provide high-quality care to a disproportionate number of low-income patients with complex health needs in the state.

(5) Transitioning from a cost-based reimbursement system toward a reimbursement structure that incentivizes quality and value by financially rewarding alternative models of care that support providers’ ability to deliver care in the most appropriate and cost-effective manner to patients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.   (SB 815)   Effective July 25, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.10.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Demonstration project” means the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration Project, Number 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, effective for the period from December 30, 2015, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, and any applicable extension period.

(b) “Demonstration term” means the entire period during which the demonstration project is in effect, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including any applicable extension period.

(c) “Demonstration year” means the demonstration year as identified in the Special
 Terms and Conditions that corresponds to a specific period of time as set forth in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive. Individual programs under the demonstration project may be operated on program years that differ from the demonstration years identified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.

(1) Demonstration year 11 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2016, to June 30, 2016, inclusive.

(2) Demonstration year 12 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2016, to June 30, 2017, inclusive.

(3) Demonstration year 13 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2017, to June 30, 2018, inclusive.

(4) Demonstration year 14 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2018, to June 30, 2019, inclusive.

(5) Demonstration year 15 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2019, to June 30, 2020, inclusive.

(6) Demonstration year 16 corresponds to the period of July 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive.

(d) “Dental Transformation Initiative” or “DTI” means the waiver program intended to improve oral health services for children, as authorized under the Special Terms and Conditions and described in Section 14184.70.

(e) “Designated state health program” has the same meaning as set forth in the Special Terms and Conditions.

(f) (1) “Designated public hospital” means any one of the following hospitals, and any successor, including any restructured, reorganized, or differently named hospital, which is operated by a county, a
 city and county, the University of California, or a special hospital authority described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 101850) or Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 101852) of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code, or any additional public hospital to the extent identified as a “designated public hospital” in the Special Terms and Conditions or, effective July 1, 2021, the CalAIM Terms and Conditions as defined in Section 14184.101. Unless otherwise provided for in law, in the California Medicaid State Plan, or in the Special Terms and Conditions, all references in law to a designated public hospital as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1 shall be deemed to refer to a hospital described in this section effective as of January 1, 2016, except as provided in paragraph (2) or, for a hospital not otherwise listed in subparagraphs (A) through (T), inclusive, as of the date specified in the applicable Terms and Conditions or State Plan amendment:

(A) UC Davis Medical Center.

(B) UC Irvine Medical Center.

(C) UC San Diego Medical Center, including, effective no sooner than January 1, 2024, the East Campus Medical Center formerly known as Alvarado Hospital Medical Center.

(D) UC San Francisco Medical Center.

(E) UCLA Medical Center.

(F) Santa Monica/UCLA Medical Center, also known as the Santa Monica-UCLA Medical Center and Orthopaedic Hospital.

(G) LA County Health System Hospitals:

(i) LA County Harbor/UCLA Medical Center.

(ii) LA County Olive View UCLA Medical Center.

(iii) LA County Rancho Los Amigos National Rehabilitation Center.

(iv) LA General Medical Center.

(H) Alameda Health System Hospitals, including the following:

(i) Highland Hospital, including the Fairmont and John George Psychiatric facilities.

(ii) Alameda Hospital.

(iii) San Leandro Hospital.

(I) Arrowhead Regional Medical Center.

(J) Contra Costa Regional Medical Center.

(K) Kern Medical Center.

(L) Natividad Medical Center.

(M) Riverside University Health System-Medical Center.

(N) San Francisco General Hospital.

(O) San Joaquin General Hospital.

(P) San Mateo Medical Center.

(Q) Santa Clara Valley Medical Center.

(R) Ventura County Medical Center.

(S) The following hospitals, effective no sooner than April 1, 2024:

(i) UCLA West Valley
 Medical Center (formerly West Hills Hospital and Medical Center).

(ii) UCI Health – Fountain Valley.

(iii) UCI Health – Lakewood.

(iv) UCI Health – Placentia Linda.

(v) UCI Health – Los Alamitos.

(T) The following hospitals, effective no sooner than the later of July 1, 2024, or the first day of the quarter following the closing of the applicable affiliation transaction with the University of California, San Francisco:

(i) UCSF Health – St. Mary’s (formerly St. Mary’s Medical Center).

(ii) UCSF Health – Saint Francis (formerly Saint Francis Memorial
 Hospital).
